Utah statutes.
31A-37a-302.   Minimum capital and surplus.

(1)  The commissioner may not issue a special purpose financial captive insurance company a certificate of authority under this chapter unless it possesses unimpaired paid-in capital and surplus of not less than $250,000 on the day on which the certificate of authority is issued.

(2)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company shall maintain unimpaired paid-in capital and surplus of not less than $250,000 at all times when having a certificate of authority under this chapter.

